Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 197.236, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Eligibility. Cemeteries must be operated solely for the burial of service members who die on active duty, eligible veterans, and their spouses and dependent children, as defined in United States Code, title 38, section deleted text begin 101deleted text end new text begin 2402new text end , paragraph deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (a), subparagraphs 1 to 5 and 7new text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 197.236, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Burial fees. (a) The commissioner of veterans affairs shall establish a fee schedule, which may be adjusted from time to time, for the interment of eligible spouses and dependent children. The fees shall cover as nearly as practicable the actual costs of interment, excluding the value of the plot. (b) Upon application, the commissioner may waive or reduce the burial fee for an indigent eligible person. The commissioner shall deleted text begin developdeleted text end new text begin maintainnew text end a policy, eligibility standards, and application form for requests to waive or reduce the burial fee to indigent eligible applicants. (c) No plot or interment fees may be charged for the burial of service members who die on active duty or eligible veterans, as defined in United States Code, title 38, section deleted text begin 101deleted text end new text begin 2402new text end , paragraph deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (a), subparagraphs 1 to 4 and 7new text end .